North Carolina, session 2025, SB274.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-177 is repealed.
SECTION 2. G.S. 7B-101(1)d. reads as rewritten:
"d. Commits, permits, or encourages the commission of a violation of the
following laws by, with, or upon the juvenile: first-degree forcible
rape, as provided in G.S. 14-27.21; second-degree forcible rape as
provided in G.S. 14-27.22; statutory rape of a child by an adult as
provided in G.S. 14-27.23; first-degree statutory rape as provided in
G.S. 14-27.24; first-degree forcible sex offense as provided in
G.S. 14-27.26; second-degree forcible sex offense as provided in
G.S. 14-27.27; statutory sexual offense with a child by an adult as
provided in G.S. 14-27.28; first-degree statutory sexual offense as
provided in G.S. 14-27.29; sexual activity by a substitute parent or
custodian as provided in G.S. 14-27.31; sexual activity with a student
as provided in G.S. 14-27.32; unlawful sale, surrender, or purchase of
a minor, as provided in G.S. 14-43.14; crime against nature, as
provided in G.S. 14-177; bestiality, as provided in G.S. 14-363.4;
incest, as provided in G.S. 14-178; preparation of obscene
photographs, slides, or motion pictures of the juvenile, as provided in
G.S. 14-190.5; employing or permitting the juvenile to assist in a
violation of the obscenity laws as provided in G.S. 14-190.6;
dissemination of obscene material to the juvenile as provided in
G.S. 14-190.7 and G.S. 14-190.8; displaying or disseminating material
harmful to the juvenile as provided in G.S. 14-190.14 and
G.S. 14-190.15; first and second degree sexual exploitation of the
juvenile as provided in G.S. 14-190.16 and G.S. 14-190.17; promoting
the prostitution of the juvenile as provided in G.S. 14-205.3(b); and
taking indecent liberties with the juvenile, as provided in
G.S. 14-202.1;"
SECTION 3. G.S. 75D-3(c)(1)b. reads as rewritten:
"b. Chapter 14 of the General Statutes of North Carolina except
Articles 9, 22A, 38, 40, 43, 46, 47, 59 thereof; and further
excepting G.S. Sections 14-78.1, 14-82, 14-86, 14-145,
*S274-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
14-146, 14-147, 14-177, 14-178, 14-179, 14-183, 14-184,
14-186, 14-190.9, 14-195, 14-197, 14-201, 14-202, 14-247,
14-248, 14-313 thereof."
SECTION 4. G.S. 115C-270.35(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Automatic Revocation With No Hearing. – The State Board shall automatically
revoke the license of a professional educator without the right to a hearing upon receiving
verification of the identity of the professional educator together with a certified copy of a criminal
record showing that the professional educator has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to
or has been finally convicted of any of the following crimes:
…
(7) Crime against nature, G.S. 14-177.
(7a) Bestiality, G.S. 14-363.4.
…
The State Board shall mail notice of its intent to act pursuant to this subsection by certified
mail, return receipt requested, directed to the professional educator's last known address. The
notice shall inform the professional educator that it will revoke the person's license unless the
professional educator notifies the State Board in writing within 10 days after receipt of the notice
that the defendant identified in the criminal record is not the same person as the professional
educator. If the professional educator provides this written notice to the State Board, the State
Board shall not revoke the license unless it can establish as a fact that the defendant and the
professional educator are the same person."
SECTION 5. Article 47 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-363.4. Bestiality.
(a) Offense. – A person commits the offense of bestiality when the person performs or
submits to any sexual act with an animal involving the sex organs of the one and the mouth, anus,
penis, or vagina of the other.
(b) Punishment. – A violation of this section is a Class I felony."
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 274-First Edition